Washington statutes.
RCW 6.36.160

Optional procedure.

The right of a judgment creditor to bring an action to enforce his or her judgment instead of proceeding under this chapter remains unimpaired.

[ 2011 c 336 s 163; 1953 c 191 s 16.]